en: Necklaces
xx: Necklaces
cs: Náhrdelníky
da: Halskæder
de: Halsketten
es: Collares
fr: Colliers, Collier
it: Collane
ja: ネックレス
nl: Halskettingen
no: Halskjeder
pl: Naszyjniki
pt: Colares
ru: Ожерелья
sv: Halsband
tr: Kolyeler

en: Rings
xx: Rings
cs: Prsteny
da: Ringe
de: Ringe
es: Anillos
fr: Bagues
it: Anelli
ja: 指輪
nl: Ringen
no: Ringer
pl: Pierścionki
pt: Anéis
ru: Кольца
sv: Ringar
tr: Yüzükler

en: Smart rings
xx: Smart rings
ar: خاتم ذكي
ja: スマートリング
ko: 스마트링
sv: Smartringar
zh: 智能戒指

en: Watch Accessories
xx: Watch Accessories
cs: Hodinky – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til ure
de: Uhrenaccessoires
es: Accesorios para reloj
fr: Accessoires pour montres
it: Accessori per orologi
ja: 時計小物
nl: Horlogeaccessoires
no: Klokketilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do zegarków
pt: Acessórios para relógios
ru: Принадлежности для наручных часов
sv: Tillbehör till armbandsklockor
tr: Kol Saati Aksesuarları

en: Watch Bands
xx: Watch Bands
cs: Náhradní pásky k hodinkám
da: Urremme
de: Uhrenarmbänder
es: Correas de reloj
fr: Bracelets de montres
it: Cinturini per orologi
ja: 時計用ベルト・バンド
nl: Horlogebanden
no: Klokkereimer
pl: Paski do zegarków
pt: Pulseiras para relógio
ru: Ремешки для часов
sv: Klockarmband
tr: Kol Saati Kayışları

en: Watch Stickers & Decals
xx: Watch Stickers & Decals
cs: Nálepky a obtisky na hodinky
da: Klistermærker til ure
de: Aufkleber für Uhren
es: Pegatinas y calcomanías para relojes
fr: Stickers et décalcomanies pour montres
it: Adesivi e decalcomanie per orologi
ja: 時計用シール・ステッカー
nl: Stickers en transfers voor horloges
no: Klokkeklistremerker og -dekaler
pl: Naklejki na tarcze
pt: Adesivos e decalques para relógio
ru: Наклейки для наручных часов
sv: Klockstickers och -dekaler
tr: Kol Saati Etiketleri ve Çıkartmaları

en: Watch Winders
xx: Watch Winders
cs: Natahovací klíčky k hodinkám
da: Uroptrækkere
de: Uhrenbeweger
es: Cuerdas para relojes
fr: Remontoirs
it: Avvolgitori per orologi
ja: 腕時計自動巻き上げ機
nl: Horlogeopwinders
no: Klokkeopptrekkere
pl: Rotomaty do zegarków
pt: Aparelhos para dar corda
ru: Устройства для завода часов
sv: Klockuppdragare
tr: Kol Saati Kutuları

en: Watches
xx: Watches
cs: Hodinky
da: Armbåndsure
de: Armbanduhren & Taschenuhren
es: Relojes de pulsera y de bolsillo
fr: Montres, Montre, Montre électronique, Montre mécanique
it: Orologi da polso
ja: 腕時計
nl: Horloges
no: Armbåndsur
pl: Zegarki
pt: Relógios de pulso
ru: Наручные и карманные часы
sv: Armbandsklockor
tr: Kol Saatleri

en: Smart watches, Smartwatches
xx: Smart Watches
fr: Montres connectées, Montre connectée

en: Shoe Accessories
xx: Shoe Accessories
cs: Doplňky k obuvi
da: Tilbehør til sko
de: Schuh-Accessoires
es: Accesorios para zapatos
fr: Accessoires pour chaussures
it: Accessori per scarpe
ja: 靴用品
nl: Accessoires voor schoenen
no: Skotilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do butów
pt: Acessórios para sapatos
ru: Принадлежности для обуви
sv: Skotillbehör
tr: Ayakkabı Aksesuarları

en: Boot Liners
xx: Boot Liners
cs: Vložky do bot
da: Støvlefor
de: Stiefelsocken
es: Forros para botas
fr: Chaussettes pour bottes
it: Fodere per stivali
ja: ブーツライナー
nl: Schoenbeschermers
no: Støvelfôr
pl: Ocieplacze do butów
pt: Revestimentos para botas
ru: Вставки для обуви
sv: Skoinlägg
tr: Ayakkabı Astarları

en: Gaiters
xx: Gaiters
cs: Návleky
da: Gamacher
de: Gamaschen
es: Polainas
fr: Guêtres
it: Ghette
ja: ゲートル
nl: Slobkousen
no: Gamasjer
pl: Sztylpy
pt: Polainas de montaria
ru: Гетры
sv: Damasker
tr: Getrler

en: Shoe Covers
xx: Shoe Covers
cs: Návleky na boty
da: Skoovertræk
de: Überschuhe
es: Fundas para zapatos
fr: Sur-chaussures
it: Coperture scarpe
ja: シューズカバー
nl: Schoenhoezen
no: Skoomslag
pl: Ochraniacze na buty
pt: Capas para calçados
ru: Бахилы
sv: Skoöverdrag
tr: Galoşlar

en: Shoelaces
xx: Shoelaces
cs: Tkaničky do bot
da: Snørebånd
de: Schnürsenkel
es: Cordones de zapatos
fr: Lacets
it: Stringhe per scarpe
ja: 靴ひも
nl: Schoenveters
no: Skolisser
pl: Sznurowadła
pt: Cadarços
ru: Шнурки для обуви
sv: Skosnören
tr: Ayakkabı Bağcıkları

en: Spurs
xx: Spurs
cs: Ostruhy
da: Sporer
de: Sporen
es: Espuelas
fr: Éperons
it: Speroni
ja: 拍車
nl: Sporen
no: Sporer
pl: Ostrogi
pt: Esporas
ru: Шпоры
sv: Sporrar
tr: Mahmuzlar

en: Shoes
xx: Shoes
cs: Obuv
da: Sko
de: Schuhe
es: Calzado
fr: Chaussures
it: Scarpe
ja: 靴
nl: Schoenen
no: Sko
pl: Buty
pt: Sapatos
ru: Обувь
sv: Skor
tr: Ayakkabılar

en: Boots
xx: Boots
fr: Bottes, Boots

en: Ankle Boots
xx: Ankle Boots
fr: Bottines

en: Sneakers
xx: Sneakers
fr: Baskets

en: Ballet Flats
xx: Ballet Flats
fr: Ballerines